incubator/apertium-pl-sk/apertium-pl-sk.pl.dix
          <l>y</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="BASE__pierwszy">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sz</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__pierwszy"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>si</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>si</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pierw/szy__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>szy<s n="det"/><s n="ord"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__pierwszy"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="lep/szy__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__pierwszy"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="najlep/szy__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__pierwszy"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="żółt/szy__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__pierwszy"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="najżółt/szy__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__pierwszy"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="BASE__dobry">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__pierwszy"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rzy</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rzy</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dob/ry__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ry<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__dobry"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ro</l>
          <r>ry<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="cpd"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="BASE__mały">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ł</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__pierwszy"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>li</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>li</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ma/ły__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ły<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__dobry"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ło</l>
          <r>ły<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="cpd"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="BASE__zły">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zł</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__pierwszy"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>źli</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>źli</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/zły__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>zły<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__zły"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zło</l>
          <r>zły<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="cpd"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="BASE__dorosły">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sł</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__pierwszy"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>śli</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>śli</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="doro/sły__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>sły<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__dorosły"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sło</l>
          <r>sły<s n="adj"/><s n="cpd"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="BASE__czwarty">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__pierwszy"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ci</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ci</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="BASE__szósty">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>st</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__pierwszy"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ści</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ści</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="BASE__ósmy">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__pierwszy"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="czwar/ty__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ty<s n="det"/><s n="ord"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__czwarty"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="szó/sty__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>sty<s n="det"/><s n="ord"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__szósty"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ósm/y__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>y<s n="det"/><s n="ord"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__ósmy"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="czy/sty__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>sty<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__szósty"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sto</l>
          <r>sty<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="cpd"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="pierwszy"><i>pierw</i><par n="pierw/szy__det"/></e>
    <e lm="czwarty"><i>czwar</i><par n="czwar/ty__det"/></e>
    <e lm="piąty"><i>pią</i><par n="czwar/ty__det"/></e>
    <e lm="szósty"><i>szó</i><par n="szó/sty__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ósmy"><i>ósm</i><par n="ósm/y__det"/></e>
    <e lm="dziewiąty"><i>dziewią</i><par n="czwar/ty__det"/></e>
    <e lm="dziesiąty"><i>dziesią</i><par n="czwar/ty__det"/></e>
    <e lm="jedenasty"><i>jedena</i><par n="szó/sty__det"/></e>
    <e lm="dwunasty"><i>dwuna</i><par n="szó/sty__det"/></e>
    <e lm="trzynasty"><i>trzyna</i><par n="szó/sty__det"/></e>
    <e lm="czternasty"><i>czterna</i><par n="szó/sty__det"/></e>
    <e lm="piętnasty"><i>piętna</i><par n="szó/sty__det"/></e>
    <e lm="szesnasty"><i>szesna</i><par n="szó/sty__det"/></e>
    <e lm="siedemnasty"><i>siedemna</i><par n="szó/sty__det"/></e>
    <e lm="osiemnasty"><i>osiemna</i><par n="szó/sty__det"/></e>
    <e lm="dziewiętnasty"><i>dziewiętna</i><par n="szó/sty__det"/></e>
    <e lm="dwudziesty"><i>dwudzie</i><par n="szó/sty__det"/></e>
    <e lm="trzydziesty"><i>trzydzie</i><par n="szó/sty__det"/></e>
    <e lm="czterdziesty"><i>czterdzie</i><par n="szó/sty__det"/></e>
    <e lm="pięćdziesiąty"><i>pięćdziesią</i><par n="czwar/ty__det"/></e>
    <e lm="sześćdziesiąty"><i>sześćdziesią</i><par n="czwar/ty__det"/></e>
    <e lm="siedemdziesiąty"><i>siedemdziesią</i><par n="czwar/ty__det"/></e>
    <e lm="osiemdziesiąty"><i>osiemdziesią</i><par n="czwar/ty__det"/></e>
    <e lm="dziewięćdziesiąty"><i>dziewięćdziesią</i><par n="czwar/ty__det"/></e>
    <e lm="setny"><i>setn</i><par n="ósm/y__det"/></e>
    <e lm="trzechsetny"><i>trzechsetn</i><par n="ósm/y__det"/></e>
    <e lm="pięćsetny"><i>pięćsetn</i><par n="ósm/y__det"/></e>
    <e lm="siedemsetny"><i>siedemsetn</i><par n="ósm/y__det"/></e>
    <e lm="dziewięćsetny"><i>dziewięćsetn</i><par n="ósm/y__det"/></e>
    <e lm="tysiączny" r="LR"><p><l>tysiączn</l><r>tysięczn</r></p><par n="ósm/y__det"/></e>
    <e lm="dwutysiączny" r="LR"><p><l>dwutysiączn</l><r>dwutysięczn</r></p><par n="ósm/y__det"/></e>
    <e lm="dwóchtysiączny" r="LR"><p><l>dwóchtysiączn</l><r>dwutysięczn</r></p><par n="ósm/y__det"/></e>
    <e lm="trzytysiączny" r="LR"><p><l>trzytysiączn</l><r>trzytysięczn</r></p><par n="ósm/y__det"/></e>
    <e lm="trzechtysiączny" r="LR"><p><l>trzechtysiączn</l><r>trzytysięczn</r></p><par n="ósm/y__det"/></e>
    <e lm="czterotysiączny" r="LR"><p><l>czterotysiączn</l><r>czterotysięczn</r></p><par n="ósm/y__det"/></e>
    <e lm="czterechtysiączny" r="LR"><p><l>czterechtysiączn</l><r>czterotysięczn</r></p><par n="ósm/y__det"/></e>
    <e lm="pięciotysiączny" r="LR"><p><l>pięciotysiączn</l><r>pięciotysięczn</r></p><par n="ósm/y__det"/></e>
    <e lm="pięćtysiączny" r="LR"><p><l>pięćtysiączn</l><r>pięciotysięczn</r></p><par n="ósm/y__det"/></e>
    <e lm="sześciotysiączny" r="LR"><p><l>sześciotysiączn</l><r>sześciotysięczn</r></p><par n="ósm/y__det"/></e>
    <e lm="sześćtysiączny" r="LR"><p><l>sześćtysiączn</l><r>sześciotysięczn</r></p><par n="ósm/y__det"/></e>
    <e lm="siedemtysiączny" r="LR"><p><l>siedemtysiączn</l><r>siedmiotysięczn</r></p><par n="ósm/y__det"/></e>
    <e lm="osiemtysiączny" r="LR"><p><l>osiemtysiączn</l><r>osiemiotysięczn</r></p><par n="ósm/y__det"/></e>
    <e><re>[0-9]+</re><par n="pierw/szy__det"/></e>
    <e><re>[0-9]+</re><par n="czwar/ty__det"/></e>
    <e><re>[0-9]+</re><i>-</i><par n="pierw/szy__det"/></e>
    <e><re>[0-9]+</re><i>-</i><par n="czwar/ty__det"/></e>
    <e><re>[0-9]+</re><i>-n</i><par n="ósm/y__det"/></e>
    <e lm="dobry"><i>dob</i><par n="dob/ry__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dobry"><p><l>lep</l><r>dobry</r></p><par n="lep/szy__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dobry"><p><l>najlep</l><r>dobry</r></p><par n="najlep/szy__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="drogi"><p><l>droż</l><r>drogi</r></p><par n="lep/szy__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="drogi"><p><l>najdroż</l><r>drogi</r></p><par n="najlep/szy__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ostry"><i>ost</i><par n="dob/ry__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ostry"><p><l>ostrzej</l><r>ostry</r></p><par n="lep/szy__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ostry"><p><l>najostrzej</l><r>ostry</r></p><par n="najlep/szy__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="mały"><i>ma</i><par n="ma/ły__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="mały"><p><l>mniej</l><r>mały</r></p><par n="lep/szy__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="mały"><p><l>najmniej</l><r>mały</r></p><par n="najlep/szy__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="zły"><i></i><par n="/zły__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="zły"><p><l>gor</l><r>zły</r></p><par n="lep/szy__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="zły"><p><l>najgor</l><r>zły</r></p><par n="najlep/szy__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="czysty"><i>czy</i><par n="czy/sty__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="czysty"><p><l>czyst</l><r>czysty</r></p><par n="lep/szy__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="czysty"><p><l>najczyst</l><r>czysty</r></p><par n="najlep/szy__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dorosły"><i>doro</i><par n="doro/sły__adj"/></e>
